District of Columbia statutes.
16-512

Attachment and levy upon wages of nonresident.

An attachment issued under section 16-501 solely on the ground that the defendant is not a resident of the District of Columbia and levied upon wages as defined in section 16-571 shall be subject to the provisions of subchapter III of this chapter; except that the employer-garnishee shall pay over the wages withheld pursuant to that subchapter only pursuant to the order of the court which has jurisdiction of the case. In applying the provisions of that subchapter to any such attachment, the term “judgment debtor”, as used therein, means the defendant in the case in which the attachment is issued; and the term “judgment creditor”, as used therein, means the plaintiff in such case.

History

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 547, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 16-512.
1973 Ed., § 16-512.